el: Συμβατή κεφαλή/μύτη περιέλιξης: Υποδοχή για εξαγωνικές μύτες (hex); Περιλαμβάνει πολλαπλές κεφαλές/μύτες; Εναλλάξιμες μύτες; Κεφαλή με εγκοπή; Υποδοχή για τετράγωνες μύτες; Κεφαλή γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
ru: Совместимая головка/бита намотчика: Шестигранный бит; Включает несколько насадок/битов; Сменные биты; Шлицевая насадка; Квадратный бит; Универсальная насадка; Другое
vi: Đầu/mũi cuốn dây tương thích: Đầu vặn lục giác; Bao gồm nhiều đầu vặn; Đầu vặn có thể hoán đổi; Đầu dẹp; Đầu vặn vuông; Đầu vặn đa năng; Khác
sv: Kompatibelt lindningshuvud/-borr: Sexkantigt bitsfäste; Inkluderar flera huvuden/bits; Utbytbara bits; Spårhuvud; Fyrkantigt bitsfäste; Universellt huvud; Övrigt
zh-CN: 适配的绕线器头/钻头: 六角批头接口; 包含多个卷线器头/批头; 可互换批头; 一字头; 方形批头接口; 通用头; 其他
es: Cabezal/broca de bobinado compatible: Interfaz de punta hexagonal; Incluye múltiples cabezales/puntas; Puntas intercambiables; Cabeza ranurada; Interfaz de punta cuadrada; Cabezal universal; Otro
de: Kompatibler Wickelkopf/Bit: Sechskant-Bit-Aufnahme; Enthält mehrere Köpfe/Bits; Auswechselbare Bits; Schlitzkopf; Vierkant-Bit-Aufnahme; Universalkopf; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní hlava/nástavec navíječe: Rozhraní pro šestihranné bity (hex); Zahrnuje více hlavic/bitů; Výměnné bity; Plochá hlava; Rozhraní pro čtyřhranné bity; Univerzální hlava; Jiné
sl-SI: Združljiva glava/nastavek za orodje za navijanje: Vmesnik za šestrobi nastavek; Vključuje več glav/nastavkov; Zamenljivi nastavki; Glava z zarezo; Vmesnik za kvadratni nastavek; Univerzalna glava; Drugo
nl: Compatibele stemknop/-bit: Zeskantbit-interface; Inclusief meerdere koppen/bits; Verwisselbare bits; Sleufkop; Vierkantbit-interface; Universele kop; Overige
fr: Tête ou embout d’enrouleur compatible: Interface pour embout hexagonal; Comprend plusieurs têtes/embouts; Embouts interchangeables; Tête fendue; Interface pour embout carré; Tête universelle; Autre
zh-TW: 相容的捲弦器頭/接頭: 六角起子頭介面; 包含多個轉頭/起子頭; 可替換起子頭; 一字起子頭; 方形起子頭介面; 通用轉頭; 其他
da: Kompatibel type opviklingshoved/bit: Sekskantet bit-grænseflade; Inkluderer flere hoveder/bits; Udskiftelige bits; Kærvhoved; Firkantet bit-grænseflade; Universalt hoved; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместима глава/накрайник на навивачката: Интерфейс за шестостенен накрайник; Включва множество глави/накрайници; Сменяеми накрайници; Прорезна глава; Интерфейс за квадратен накрайник; Универсална глава; Друг
nb: Kompatibelt viklerhode/-bit: Sekskantbits-grensesnitt; Inkluderer flere hoder/bits; Utskiftbare bits; Sporskruehode / flatt hode; Firkantbits-grensesnitt; Universelt hode; Annet
pt-PT: Cabeçote/broca de enrolamento compatível: Interface com ponta sextavada; Inclui várias cabeças/pontas; Pontas substituíveis; Cabeça plana; Interface com ponta quadrada; Cabeça universal; Outra
pt-BR: Cabeça/ponta de enrolador compatível: Encaixe para bit hexagonal; Inclui múltiplas cabeças/bits; Bits intercambiáveis; Cabeça de fenda; Encaixe para bit quadrado; Cabeça universal; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinama suktuvo galvutė / antgalis: Šešiakampio antgalio sąsaja; Yra kelių tipų galvutės / antgaliai; Keičiami antgaliai; Įpjovos galvutė; Kvadratinio antgalio sąsaja; Universali galvutė; Kita
ko: 호환되는 와인더 헤드/비트: 육각 비트 인터페이스; 복수 헤드/비트 포함; 교체 가능 비트; 슬롯 헤드; 사각 비트 인터페이스; 범용 헤드; 기타
fi: Yhteensopiva virityskammen kelauspää: Kuusiokärjen liitäntä; Sisältää useita päitä/kärkiä; Vaihdettavat kärjet; Urapää; Nelikulmakärjen liitäntä; Universaali pää; Muu
tr: Uyumlu sarma aparatı başlığı/ucu: Altıgen uç arayüzü; Çoklu başlık/uç içerir; Değiştirilebilir uçlar; Yivli başlık; Kare uç arayüzü; Evrensel başlık; Diğer
it: Testa/punta di avvolgimento compatibile: Interfaccia con punta esagonale; Include più teste/punte; Punte intercambiabili; Testa a taglio; Interfaccia con punta quadrata; Testa universale; Altro
pl: Kompatybilna główka/końcówka nawijarki: Złącze bita sześciokątnego (hex); Zawiera wiele głowic/bitów; Wymienne bity; Głowica płaska; Złącze bita kwadratowego; Głowica uniwersalna; Inne
sk-SK: Kompatibilná hlavica/bit navíjačky: Rozhranie pre šesťhranný bit; Obsahuje viacero hláv/bitov; Vymeniteľné bity; Plochá hlava; Rozhranie pre štvorhranný bit; Univerzálna hlava; Iné
th: หัว/ดอกสว่านของเครื่องม้วนที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: อินเทอร์เฟซดอกไขควงหกเหลี่ยม; มีหัว/ดอกไขควงหลายแบบ; ดอกไขควงแบบเปลี่ยนได้; หัวแบน; อินเทอร์เฟซดอกไขควงสี่เหลี่ยม; หัวไขควงอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna glava/nastavak za namatanje: Sučelje za šesterokutni nastavak (imbus); Uključuje više glava/nastavaka; Izmjenjivi nastavci; Glava s utorom; Sučelje za kvadratni nastavak; Univerzalna glava; Ostalo
ro-RO: Cap/bit de bobinator compatibil: Interfață cu bit hexagonal; Include mai multe capete/biți; Biți interschimbabili; Cap plat (slotted); Interfață cu bit pătrat; Cap universal; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis tekercselőfej: Hatszögletű bit foglalat; Több fejet/bitet tartalmaz; Cserélhető bitek; Lapos fejű; Négyszögletű bit foglalat; Univerzális fej; Egyéb
en: Compatible winder head/bit: Hex bit interface; Includes multiple heads/bits; Interchangeable bits; Slotted head; Square bit interface; Universal head; Other
ja: 互換性のあるワインダーヘッド／ビット: 六角ビットインターフェース; 複数のヘッド/ビットが付属; 交換可能ビット; スロットヘッド; スクエアビットインターフェース; ユニバーサルヘッド; その他